Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1106.
do enact as follows:SB1106,11Section 1. 49.471 (2) of the statutes is renumbered 49.471 (2) (a).SB1106,22Section 2. 49.471 (2) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB1106,2,7349.471 (2) (b) The commissioner of insurance shall seek any necessary federal 4approval for eligibility for individuals described under sub. (4) (a) 4m. and 8. for the 5benefits described in s. 49.46 (2) (a) and (b). If the federal government does not 6grant the necessary approval, an individual described under sub. (4) (a) 4m. or 8. is 7not eligible for the benefits described in s. 49.46 (2) (a) and (b).SB1106,38Section 3. 49.471 (4) (a) 4. b. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1106,2,11949.471 (4) (a) 4. b. The individual’s family income does not exceed 100 percent 10of the poverty line before application of the 5 percent income disregard under 42 11CFR 435.603 (d).SB1106,412Section 4. 49.471 (4) (a) 4m. of the statutes is created to read:SB1106,2,141349.471 (4) (a) 4m. Subject to any necessary federal approval under sub. (2) (b), 14an individual who satisfies all of the following criteria:SB1106,3,415a. The individual is a parent or caretaker relative of a dependent child who is 16living in the home with the parent or caretaker relative or who is temporarily 17absent from the home for not more than 6 months or, if the dependent child has 18been removed from the home for more than 6 months, the parent or caretaker 19relative is working toward unifying the family by complying with a permanency 20plan under s. 48.38 or 938.38. For purposes of this subdivision, a “dependent child” 1means an individual who is under the age of 18 or an individual who is age 18 and 2a full-time student in secondary school or equivalent vocational or technical 3training if before attaining the age of 19 the individual is reasonably expected to 4complete the school or training.SB1106,3,65b. The individual’s family income is between 101 percent and 133 percent of 6the poverty line.SB1106,57Section 5. 49.471 (4) (a) 8. of the statutes is created to read:SB1106,3,9849.471 (4) (a) 8. Subject to any necessary federal approval under sub. (2) (b), 9an individual who meets all of the following criteria:SB1106,3,1010a. The individual is an adult under the age of 65.SB1106,3,1311b. The adult’s family income is between 101 percent, before application of the 125 percent income disregard under 42 CFR 435.603 (d), and 133 percent of the 13poverty line.SB1106,3,1514c. The adult is not otherwise eligible for the Medical Assistance program 15under this subchapter or the Medicare program under 42 USC 1395 et seq.SB1106,616Section 6. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 17publication, except as follows:SB1106,3,2018(1) Medical assistance eligibility expansion. The treatment of s. 49.471 19(4) (a) 4m. and 8., the renumbering of s. 49.471 (2) (a), and the creation of s. 49.471 20(2) (b) take effect on January 1, 2029.SB1106,3,2121